Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.070

Warrants—Indorsement—Interest—Issuance of new warrants.

Upon the presentation of any state warrant to the state treasurer, if there is not sufficient money then available in the appropriate fund with which to redeem all warrants drawn against such fund which the treasurer anticipates will be presented for payment during the current business day, he or she may endorse on the warrant, "Not paid for want of funds," with the day and date of presentation, and the warrant shall draw legal interest from and including that date until five days from and after being called for payment in accordance with RCW 43.08.080, or until paid, whichever occurs first; or, in the alternative, the treasurer may prepare and register a single new warrant, drawn against the appropriate fund, and exchange such new warrant for one or more warrants not paid for want of funds when presented for payment totaling a like amount but not exceeding one million dollars, which new warrant shall then draw legal interest from and including its date of issuance until five days from and after being called for payment in accordance with RCW 43.08.080, or until paid, whichever occurs first. The legal rate or rates of interest on these warrants shall be established by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.56.030.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5039; 1981 c 10 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 88 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.070. Prior: 1869 p 408 s 2; RRS s 5516.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 88: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 88 s 6.]